tools/nvda/louis/tables/hyph_es_ES.dic
ISO8859-1
1b2ra
1b2rá
1b2re
1b2ré
1b2ri
1b2rí
1b2ro
1b2ró
1b2ru
1b2rú
1b2la
1b2lá
1b2le
1b2lé
1b2li
1b2lí
1b2lo
1b2ló
1b2lu
1b2lú
1c2ra
1c2rá
1c2re
1c2ré
1c2ri
1c2rí
1c2ro
1c2ró
1c2ru
1c2rú
1c2la
1c2lá
1c2le
1c2lé
1c2li
1c2lí
1c2lo
1c2ló
1c2lu
1c2lú
1d2ra
1d2rá
1d2re
1d2ré
1d2ri
1d2rí
1d2ro
1d2ró
1d2ru
1d2rú
1f2ra
1d2rá
1d2re
1d2ré
1d2ri
1d2rí
1d2ro
1d2ró
1d2ru
1d2rú
1f2la
1f2lá
1f2le
1f2lé
1f2li
1f2lí
1f2lo
1f2ló
1f2lu
1f2lú
1f2ra
1f2rá
1f2re
1f2ré
1f2ri
1f2rí
1f2ro
1f2ró
1f2ru
1f2rú
1g2ra
1g2rá
1g2re
1g2ré
1g2ri
1g2rí
1g2ro
1g2ró
1g2ru
1g2rú
1g2la
1g2lá
1g2le
1g2lé
1g2li
1g2lí
1g2lo
1g2ló
1g2lu
1g2lú
1k2ra
1k2rá
1k2re
1k2ré
1k2ri
1k2rí
1k2ro
1k2ró
1k2ru
1k2rú
1l2la
1l2lá
1l2le
1l2lé
1l2li
1l2lí
1l2lo
1l2ló
1l2lu
1l2lú
1p2ra
1p2rá
1p2re
1p2ré
1p2ri
1p2rí
1p2ro
1p2ró
1p2ru
1p2rú
1p2la
1p2lá
1p2le
1p2lé
1p2li
1p2lí
1p2lo
1p2ló
1p2lu
1p2lú
1t2ra
1t2rá
1t2re
1t2ré
1t2ri
1t2rí
1t2ro
1t2ró
1t2ru
1t2rú
1r2ra
1r2rá
1r2re
1r2ré
1r2ri
1r2rí
1r2ro
1r2ró
1r2ru
1r2rú
1c2ha
1c2há
1c2he
1c2hé
1c2hi
1c2hí
1c2ho
1c2hó
1c2hu
1c2hú

1ba
1bá
1be
1bé
1bi
1bí
1bo
1bó
1bu
1bú
1bü
1ca
1cá
1ce
1cé
1ci
1cí
1co
1có
1cu
1cú
1cü
1da
1dá
1de
1dé
1di
1dí
1do
1dó
1du
1dú
1dü
1fa
1fá
1fe
1fé
1fi
1fí
1fo
1fó
1fu
1fú
1fü
1ga
1gá
1ge
1gé
1gi
1gí
1go
1gó
1gu
1gú
1gü
1ja
1já
1je
1jé
1ji
1jí
1jo
1jó
1ju
1jú
1jü
1ka
1ká
1ke
1ké
1ki
1kí
1ko
1kó
1ku
1kú
1kü
1la
1lá
1le
1lé
1li
1lí
1lo
1ló
1lu
1lú
1lü
1ma
1má
1me
1mé
1mi
1mí
1mo
1mó
1mu
1mú
1mü
1na
1ná
1ne
1né
1ni
1ní
1no
1nó
1nu
1nú
1nü
1ña
1ñá
1ñe
1ñé
1ñi
1ñí
1ño
1ñó
1ñu
1ñú
1ñü
1pa
1pá
1pe
1pé
1pi
1pí
1po
1pó
1pu
1pú
1pü
1qa
1qá
1qe
1qé
1qi
1qí
1qo
1qó
1qú
1qü
1ra
1rá
1re
1ré
1ri
1rí
1ro
1ró
1ru
1rú
1rü
1sa
1sá
1se
1sé
1si
1sí
1so
1só
1su
1sú
1sü
1ta
1tá
1te
1té
1ti
1tí
1to
1tó
1tu
1tú
1tü
1va
1vá
1ve
1vé
1vi
1ví
1vo
1vó
1vu
1vú
1vü
1wa
1wá
1we
1wé
1wi
1wí
1wo
1wó
1wu
1wú
1wü
1xa
1xá
1xe
1xé
1xi
1xí
1xo
1xó
1xu
1xú
1xü
1ya
1yá
1ye
1yé
1yi
1yí
1yo
1yó
1yu
1yú
1yü
1za
1zá
1ze
1zé
1zi
1zí
1zo
1zó
1zu
1zú
1zü
h1b
h1c
h1d
h1f
h1g
h1h
h1j
h1k
h1l
h1m
h1n
h1ñ
h1p
h1q
h1r
h1s
h1t
h1v
h1w
h1x
h1y
h1z
1ai
1au
1ei
1eu
1io
1ou
1ia
1ua
1ie
1ue
1oi
1uo
1ui
1iu
1ay
1ey
1oy
a1a
a1e
a1o
e1a
e1e
e1o
o1a
o1e
o1o

a1ha
a1há
á1ha
a1he
a1hé
á1he
a1ho
a1hó
á1ho
e1ha
e1há
é1ha
e1he
e1hé
é1he
e1ho
e1hó
é1ho
o1ha
o1há
ó1ha
o1he
o1hé
ó1he
o1ho
o1hó
ó1ho

1ahy
1ehy
1ohy
1iai
1iei
1uai
1uei
1uau
1iau
1uay
1uey

1guay

1gua
1güa
1gue
1güe
1gui
1güi
1guo
1güo

1bai
1cai
1dai
1fai
1gai
1jai
1kai
1lai
1mai
1nai
1ñai
1pai
1rai
1sai
1tai
1vai
1wai
1xai
1zai
1bau
1cau
1dau
1fau
1gau
1jau
1kau
1lau
1mau
1nau
1ñau
1pau
1rau
1sau
1tau
1vau
1wau
1xau
1zau
1bei
1cei
1dei
1fei
1gei
1jei
1kei
1lei
1mei
1nei
1ñei
1pei
1rei
1sei
1tei
1vei
1wei
1xei
1zei
1beu
1ceu
1deu
1feu
1geu
1jeu
1keu
1leu
1meu
1neu
1ñeu
1peu
1reu
1seu
1teu
1veu
1weu
1xeu
1zeu
1bio
1cio
1dio
1fio
1gio
1jio
1kio
1lio
1mio
1nio
1ñio
1pio
1rio
1sio
1tio
1vio
1wio
1xio
1zio
1bou
1cou
1dou
1fou
1gou
1jou
1kou
1lou
1mou
1nou
1ñou
1pou
1rou
1sou
1tou
1vou
1wou
1xou
1zou
1bia
1cia
1dia
1fia
1gia
1jia
1kia
1lia
1mia
1nia
1ñia
1pia
1ria
1sia
1tia
1via
1wia
1xia
1zia
1bua
1cua
1dua
1fua

1jua
1kua
1lua
1mua
1nua
1ñua
1pua
1qua
1rua
1sua
1tua
1vua
1wua
1xua
1zua
1bie
1cie
1die
1fie
1gie
1jie
1kie
1lie
1mie
1nie
1ñie
1pie
1rie
1sie
1tie
1vie
1wie
1xie
1zie
1bue
1cue
1due
1fue

1jue
1kue
1lue
1mue
1nue
1ñue
1pue
1que
1qué
1rue
1sue
1tue
1vue
1wue
1xue
1zue
1boi
1coi
1doi
1foi
1goi
1joi
1koi
1loi
1moi
1noi
1ñoi
1poi
1roi
1soi
1toi
1voi
1woi
1xoi
1zoi
1buo
1cuo
1duo
1fuo

1juo
1kuo
1luo
1muo
1nuo
1ñuo
1puo
1quo
1ruo
1suo
1tuo
1vuo
1wuo
1xuo
1zuo
1bui
1cui
1dui
1fui

1jui
1kui
1lui
1mui
1nui
1ñui
1pui
1qui
1rui
1sui
1tui
1vui
1wui
1xui
1zui
1biu
1ciu
1diu
1fiu
1giu
1jiu
1kiu
1liu
1miu
1niu
1ñiu
1piu
1riu
1siu
1tiu
1viu
1wiu
1xiu
1ziu
1bay
1cay
1day
1fay
1gay
1jay
1kay
1lay
1may
1nay
1ñay
1pay
1ray
1say
1tay
1vay
1way
1xay
1zay
1bey
1cey
1dey
1fey
1gey
1jey
1key
1ley
1mey
1ney
1ñey
1pey
1rey
1sey
1tey
1vey
1wey
1xey
1zey
1boy
1coy
1doy
1foy
1goy
1joy
1koy
1loy
1moy
1noy
1ñoy
1poy
1roy
1soy
1toy
1voy
1woy
1xoy
1zoy

í1a
a1í
a1ú
ú1a
e1í
í1e
e1ú
ú1e
í1o
o1í
o1ú
ú1o
ú1i
í1u

quei
quéi
queí
queu
quéu
queú
quio
quío
quió
quia
quía
quiá
quie
quíe
quié

guei
guéi
gueí
gueu
guéu
gueú
guio
guío
guió
guia
guía
guiá
guie
guíe
guié
